Nebraska, session 109, LB493.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB493 LB493
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 14 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Uniform Public Expression Protection Act.
Sec. 2. (a) In this section:
(1) Goods or services does not include the creation, dissemination,
exhibition, or advertisement or similar promotion of a dramatic,
literary, musical, political, journalistic, or artistic work.
(2) Governmental unit means a public corporation or government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(3) Person means an individual, estate, trust, partnership, business
or nonprofit entity, governmental unit, or other legal entity.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the Uniform
Public Expression Protection Act applies to a cause of action asserted in
a civil action against a person based on the person's:
(1) communication in a legislative, executive, judicial,
administrative, or other governmental proceeding;
(2) communication on an issue under consideration or review in a
legislative, executive, judicial, administrative, or other governmental
proceeding; or
(3) exercise of the right of freedom of speech or of the press, the
right to assemble or petition, or the right of association, guaranteed by
the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Nebraska, on a
matter of public concern.
(c) The Uniform Public Expression Protection Act does not apply to a
cause of action asserted:
(1) against a governmental unit or an employee or agent of a
governmental unit acting or purporting to act in an official capacity;
(2) by a governmental unit or an employee or agent of a governmental
unit acting in an official capacity to enforce a law to protect against
an imminent threat to public health or safety; or
(3) against a person primarily engaged in the business of selling or
leasing goods or services if the cause of action arises out of a
-2-

LB493 LB493
2025 2025
communication related to the person's sale or lease of the goods or
services.
Sec. 3. Not later than sixty days after a party is served with a
complaint, petition, crossclaim, counterclaim, third-party claim, or
other pleading that asserts a cause of action to which the Uniform Public
Expression Protection Act applies, or at a later time on a showing of
good cause, the party may file a special motion for expedited relief to
dismiss the cause of action or part of the cause of action.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) through
(g), on the filing of a motion under section 3 of this act:
(1) all other proceedings between the moving party and responding
party, including discovery and a pending hearing or motion, are stayed;
and
(2) on motion by the moving party, the court may stay a hearing or
motion involving another party, or discovery by another party, if the
hearing or ruling on the motion would adjudicate, or the discovery would
relate to, an issue material to the motion under section 3 of this act.
(b) A stay under subsection (a) remains in effect until entry of an
order ruling on the motion under section 3 of this act and expiration of
the time under section 9 of this act for the moving party to appeal the
order.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e), (f), and (g),
if a party appeals from an order ruling on a motion under section 3 of
this act, all proceedings between all parties in the action are stayed.
The stay remains in effect until the conclusion of the appeal.
(d) During a stay under subsection (a), the court may allow limited
discovery if a party shows that specific information is necessary to
establish whether a party has satisfied or failed to satisfy a burden
under subsection (a) of section 7 of this act and the information is not
reasonably available unless discovery is allowed.
(e) A motion under section 10 of this act for costs, attorney's
-3-

LB493 LB493
2025 2025
fees, and expenses is not subject to a stay under this section.
(f) A stay under this section does not affect a party's ability
voluntarily to dismiss a cause of action or part of a cause of action or
move to sever a cause of action.
(g) During a stay under this section, the court for good cause may
hear and rule on:
(1) a motion unrelated to the motion under section 3 of this act;
and
(2) a motion seeking a special or preliminary injunction to protect
against an imminent threat to public health or safety.
Sec. 5. (a) The court shall hear a motion under section 3 of this
act not later than sixty days after filing of the motion, unless the
court orders a later hearing:
(1) to allow discovery under subsection (d) of section 4 of this
act; or
(2) for other good cause.
(b) If the court orders a later hearing under subsection (a)(1), the
court shall hear the motion under section 3 of this act not later than
sixty days after the court order allowing the discovery, unless the court
orders a later hearing under subsection (a)(2).
Sec. 6. In ruling on a motion under section 3 of this act, the
court shall consider the pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to
the motion, and any evidence that could be considered in ruling on a
motion for summary judgment.
Sec. 7. (a) In ruling on a motion under section 3 of this act, the
court shall dismiss with prejudice a cause of action, or part of a cause
of action, if:
(1) the moving party establishes under subsection (b) of section 2
of this act that the Uniform Public Expression Protection Act applies;
(2) the responding party fails to establish under subsection (c) of
section 2 of this act that the Uniform Public Expression Protection Act
-4-

LB493 LB493
2025 2025
does not apply; and
(3) either:
(A) the responding party fails to establish a prima facie case as to
each essential element of the cause of action; or
(B) the moving party establishes that:
(i) the responding party failed to state a cause of action upon
which relief can be granted; or
(ii) there is no genuine issue as to any material fact and the
moving party is entitled to judgment as a matter of law on the cause of
action or part of the cause of action.
(b) A voluntary dismissal without prejudice of a responding party's
cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is the subject of a
motion under section 3 of this act does not affect a moving party's right
to obtain a ruling on the motion and seek costs, attorney's fees, and
expenses under section 10 of this act.
(c) A voluntary dismissal with prejudice of a responding party's
cause of action, or part of a cause of action, that is the subject of a
motion under section 3 of this act establishes for the purpose of section
10 of this act that the moving party prevailed on the motion.
Sec. 8. The court shall rule on a motion under section 3 of this
act not later than sixty days after a hearing under section 5 of this
act.
Sec. 9. A moving party may appeal as a matter of right from an
order denying, in whole or in part, a motion under section 3 of this act.
The appeal must be filed not later than twenty-one days after entry of
the order.
Sec. 10. On a motion under section 3 of this act, the court shall
award court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, and reasonable litigation
expenses related to the motion:
(1) to the moving party if the moving party prevails on the motion;
or
-5-

LB493 LB493
2025 2025
(2) to the responding party if the responding party prevails on the
motion and the court finds that the motion was frivolous or filed solely
with intent to delay the proceeding.
Sec. 11. The Uniform Public Expression Protection Act must be
broadly construed and applied to protect the exercise of the right of
freedom of speech and of the press, the right to assemble and petition,
and the right of association, guaranteed by the United States
Constitution or the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 12. In applying and construing the Uniform Public Expression
Protection Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states
that enact it.
Sec. 13. The Uniform Public Expression Protection Act applies to a
civil action filed or cause of action asserted in a civil action on or
after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 14. The Uniform Public Expression Protection Act does not
affect a cause of action asserted before the effective date of this act
in a civil action or a motion under sections 25-21,241 to 25-21,246
regarding the cause of action.
Sec. 15. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 16. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
25-21,241, 25-21,242, 25-21,243, 25-21,244, 25-21,245, and 25-21,246,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 17. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-